Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB233.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1716-A(b) and (b.1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1716-A. Powers of Board of Trustees.--* * *(b) [A] Except as provided for under subsection (b.4), a member of a local board of school directors of a school entity may not serve on the board of trustees of a charter school entity that is located in the member's district.(b.1) [For] Except as provided for under subsection (b.4), for a charter school or regional charter school chartered after 12345678910111213141516171819 the effective date of this subsection, an individual may not serve as a voting member of the board of trustees of the charter school or regional charter school if the individual or a family member receives compensation from or is employed by or is a member of the local board of school directors who participated in the initial review, approval, oversight, evaluation or renewal process of the charter school or regional charter school chartered by the board.* * *(b.4) The board of trustees of a charter school shall include a member appointed by the local board of school directors. In the case of a regional charter school, each board of school directors for the chartering school districts shall appoint a member.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0233PN0186 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516